Utah statutes.
32B-6-704.   Local authority to issue a license.

(1)  A local authority may issue a license to operate as an on-premise beer retailer, subject to:

(a)  the requirement under this part that a person obtain an on-premise beer retailer license issued by the commission to operate as an on-premise beer retailer; and

(b)  subject to Title 11, Chapter 10, Businesses Allowing Consumption of an Alcoholic Product on Premises.

(2)  For a violation of this title, rules of the commission, or a local ordinance, a local authority may suspend or revoke a business license described in Subsection (1).

(3) (a)  If the commission suspends or revokes an on-premise beer retailer license issued by the commission under this title, the on-premise beer retailer may not continue to operate under a license issued by a local authority.

(b)  If a local authority suspends or revokes a business license described in Subsection (1), an on-premise beer retailer may not continue to operate under the on-premise beer retailer license issued by the commission.

(4)  A person issued a business license issued by a local authority as described in Subsection (1) shall comply with this title, including a provision related to the storage, sale, offer for sale, furnishing, consumption, warehousing, or distribution of beer.

